Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2118.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin MINNESOTA COUNCIL ON ECONOMIC EDUCATION; PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT ACTIVITIES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Purpose. new text end new text begin The Minnesota Council on Economic Education may provide professional development activities to Minnesota's teachers. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Grant uses. new text end new text begin Grant money received by the Minnesota Council on Economic Education must be used to: new text end new text begin (1) provide professional development to and curate and develop curricular resources for: new text end new text begin (i) Minnesota's kindergarten through grade 12 teachers implementing state graduation standards in learning areas related to economic and financial education; and new text end new text begin (ii) Minnesota's grade 9 through 12 teachers providing personal finance and consumer protection instruction to students; new text end new text begin (2) support the direct-to-student ancillary economic and personal finance programs that Minnesota teachers supervise and coach or that the Minnesota Council on Economic Education delivers directly to students; new text end new text begin (3) support research on the effectiveness of economic and financial literacy education in kindergarten through grade 12 to ensure that the intent of the economics graduation standards and the high school personal finance course requirement is being met, and to identify avenues for improving economic and financial literacy education; and new text end new text begin (4) support geographically diverse affiliated higher education faculty and higher education-based centers for economic and financial literacy education, including those based at Minnesota State University, Mankato; St. Cloud State University; and St. Catherine University, for activities related to clauses (1) to (3). new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Reporting. new text end new text begin (a) By February 15 of each year following the receipt of grant money, the Minnesota Council on Economic Education must provide a midyear report to the commissioner of education. By August 15 of each year following receipt of grant money, the Minnesota Council on Economic Education must prepare a year-end report containing at least the information required in paragraph (b) to the commissioner of education in the form and manner prescribed by the commissioner. The commissioner may request additional information as necessary. new text end new text begin (b) The report must include: new text end new text begin (1) the number and type of in-person and online teacher professional development opportunities provided by the Minnesota Council on Economic Education or its affiliated state centers; new text end new text begin (2) a description of the content, length, and location of the programs; new text end new text begin (3) the number of preservice and licensed teachers receiving professional development through each of these opportunities; new text end new text begin (4) summaries of evaluations of teacher professional opportunities; new text end new text begin (5) a list of the number, types, and summary evaluations of the direct-to-student ancillary personal finance programs that are supported by grant money; and new text end new text begin (6) a description and the status of all economic and financial literacy education research and results of the research supported by grant money. new text end new text begin (c) The reports required under this subdivision must be prepared and filed according to section 3.195. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Grant payment schedule. new text end new text begin The Department of Education must pay one-half of the amount of any grant money awarded to the Minnesota Council on Economic Education by August 15 of each fiscal year for which the money is appropriated and the other half must be paid by February 15 of that same fiscal year. The Minnesota Council on Economic Education must submit its fiscal reporting in the form and manner specified by the commissioner. The commissioner may request additional financial information as necessary. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; MINNESOTA COUNCIL ON ECONOMIC EDUCATION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Minnesota Council on Economic Education. new text end new text begin For a grant to the Minnesota Council on Economic Education for providing personal finance programs, economic education, and professional development to teachers: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 800,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 800,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end